Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 8. DEATH AND DISPOSITION OF THE BODY

SUBTITLE B. DISPOSITION OF THE BODY

CHAPTER 696. DISPOSITION OF UNCLAIMED CREMATED REMAINS

Sec. 696.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Verification information" means data required by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to verify whether a person is a veteran or a veteran's dependent eligible for burial in a veterans cemetery, including a copy of the person's death certificate and the person's name, service number, social security number, date of birth, date of death, and place of birth.

(2) "Veterans' service organization" means:

(A) a veterans' organization that is chartered by the United States Congress;

(B) a veterans' service organization recognized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or

(C) a veterans' service organization that is organized for verifying whether a person is a veteran or a veteran's dependent and providing for interment of veterans and their dependents and that is exempt from the payment of federal income taxes under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 by being listed as an exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(19) of that code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 373 (H.B. 3064), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 696.002. APPLICABILITY. This chapter applies to any person who possesses unclaimed cremated remains, including a funeral establishment or funeral director licensed under Chapter 651, Occupations Code, a coroner, or a crematory.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 373 (H.B. 3064), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 696.003. AUTHORIZATION TO RELEASE INFORMATION. A person who possesses unclaimed cremated remains may release to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or a veterans' service organization verification information associated with the remains to verify whether the remains are the remains of a person who was a veteran or a veteran's dependent eligible to be interred in a veterans cemetery if:

(1) the person has possessed the cremated remains for at least five years;

(2) the person authorized to dispose of the decedent's remains under Section 711.002 has not claimed the cremated remains; and

(3) the person made a reasonable effort to locate a relative of the decedent to claim the remains, including publishing notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the person is located, and more than 30 days have passed since the person first made an effort to locate a relative of the decedent.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 373 (H.B. 3064), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 696.004. TRANSFER OF UNCLAIMED CREMATED REMAINS. A person who receives notice from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or a veterans' service organization that the unclaimed cremated remains are the remains of a veteran or veteran's dependent eligible to be interred in a veterans cemetery may:

(1) transport the cremated remains to the veterans cemetery for burial; or

(2) transfer the cremated remains to a veterans' service organization that will ensure that the cremated remains are interred in a veterans cemetery.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 373 (H.B. 3064), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 696.005. CIVIL IMMUNITY. (a) A person who releases verification information as authorized by this chapter or who transfers cremated remains to a veterans' service organization or a veterans cemetery as authorized by this chapter is immune from civil liability for damages resulting from the release or transfer.

(b) A veterans' service organization that inters cremated remains in a veterans cemetery as authorized by this chapter is immune from civil liability for damages arising from the interment.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 373 (H.B. 3064), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.